Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Medical Assistance Act
71-5-118. Contracts with vendors — Sanctions against vendors — Grounds for actions against providers — Administrative remedy to recover benefits from applicant — Collection activity report — Applicant warning — Prompt process of hospital presumptive eligibility applications.

The commissioner of finance and administration has the authority to enter into contracts with qualified vendors to provide to eligible recipients medical assistance allowed under § 71-5-107. The commissioner has the authority to terminate or suspend existing contracts with providers, to refuse to enter into contracts with providers, and to recover any payments incorrectly paid if the commissioner finds that such actions will further the purpose of this section. Any action against such provider shall be treated as a contested case in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. If a hearing is requested by the provider, it shall be held prior to the imposition of any of the sanctions of this subsection (a), except that upon a finding by the commissioner that the public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, these sanctions may be imposed pending an opportunity for the provider to request a prompt hearing. Furthermore, the commissioner has the right to set off any money incorrectly paid against any claim for money submitted by the provider pending an opportunity for a hearing. Grounds for action against providers under this subsection (a) include, but are not limited to, the following:

Violation of the terms of the contract;

Violation of any provision of this part or the rules promulgated pursuant to this part;

Billing for medical assistance that was not delivered;

Provision of medical assistance that is not medically necessary or justified;

Provision of medical assistance of a quality that is below professionally recognized standards;

Revocation or suspension of a provider's professional license or other disciplinary action by the agency regulating the profession of the provider; and

Failure to produce records, upon request, by authorized representatives of the commissioner as necessary to substantiate the medical assistance for which claims have been submitted.

Without regard to any other civil or criminal liability that might attach, by operation of this section or any other law, to an enrollee or applicant's action in obtaining medical assistance or any assistance under this part, to which such person is not entitled, the bureau of TennCare shall have an administrative remedy for the recovery of the amount of any medical assistance benefits or payments improperly paid as a result of any misrepresentation made by such person, to the extent that such amount has not otherwise been recovered by the bureau. The bureau shall also have a right to recover in such administrative proceedings its reasonable costs and attorneys' fees, as well as interest on the amount owed by the person, calculated from the date that medical assistance was improperly paid. Any action against such person shall be treated as a contested case in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. In an administrative action under this subsection (b), the bureau shall show that the amount sought to be recovered was paid in the form of medical assistance as a result of material misrepresentation by the person against whom recovery is sought, but the bureau need not show that such misrepresentation was intentional or fraudulent.

The bureau of TennCare shall report annually in writing to the judiciary committee of the senate, the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare regarding its collection activities of the estate recovery provisions of this chapter.

All applicants for medical assistance under this part, and all applicants for reverification of eligibility to receive such assistance, shall receive a warning, in easily readable language, regarding the state recovery provisions, as well as the administrative, civil and criminal liability provisions of this chapter.

The participating provider shall strive to process hospital presumptive eligibility applications within the first twenty-four (24) hours of the date of admission, when practicable. To the extent a participating provider fails to adhere to this standard, the bureau of TennCare may take remedial steps as allowed by federal law.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 18; 1973, ch. 73, § 2; 1978, ch. 539, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-1918; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 16; T.C.A., §14-23-118; Acts 1987, ch. 420, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 107; 1991, ch. 406, § 2; 1993, ch. 428, § 1; 2000, ch. 853, § 1; 2002, ch. 702, § 1; 2002, ch. 880, §§ 7, 10-13; 2004, ch. 673, § 10; 2013, ch. 236, § 43; 2019, ch. 345, § 136; 2020, ch. 775, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of responsibility for investigating fraud in the medicaid program from the department of health and environment (now health) to the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation, see Executive Order No. 47 (February 11, 1983).

Acts 2000, ch. 853, § 4, provided:

“This act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2000.”

Acts 2000, ch. 853, § 5, provided:

“No later than October 1, 2000, the department shall report to the TennCare oversight committee recommendations for establishing duties of medicaid applicants and enrollees to report material changes affecting eligibility. Such recommendations shall identify any categories of persons for whom, based upon program requirements, reporting should not be required; shall specify procedures for reporting; shall identify to whom such reporting should occur; and shall recommend criminal sanctions for noncompliance that constitutes theft of services.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2020, ch. 775, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as “Cooper's Law.”

Acts 2020, ch. 775, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to agreements entered into or renewed on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the judiciary committee of the senate, the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “"the criminal justice committee of the house of representatives and the judiciary committee of the senate” in (c).

The 2020 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 775, § 3. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class B, Class C, Class D, and Class E felonies, §40-35-111.

71-5-119. Discrimination prohibited.

No discrimination shall be practiced or asserted against any applicant for or recipient of medical assistance under this chapter on the basis of race, color or national origin.

The furnishing of care and services under this part to any applicant or recipient of medical assistance shall not be delayed or denied on the basis of race, color or national origin.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 19; T.C.A., § 14-1919; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 17; T.C.A., §14-23-119.

71-5-120. Residency requirement — Determination — Appeal.

No period of residence in this state shall be required as a condition for eligibility for medical assistance under this chapter, but an individual who does not reside in this state shall not be eligible.

The bureau of TennCare shall adopt rules for determining whether an applicant is a resident of this state subject to the requirements of federal law. The rules shall require that state residency is not established unless the applicant does both of the following:

The applicant produces one (1) of the following:

A current Tennessee rent or mortgage receipt or utility bill in the adult applicant's name;

A current Tennessee motor vehicle driver's license or identification card issued by the Tennessee department of safety in the adult applicant's name;

A current Tennessee motor vehicle registration in the adult applicant's name;

A document showing that the adult applicant is employed in this state;

A document showing that the adult applicant has registered with a public or private employment service in this state;

Evidence that the adult applicant has enrolled the applicant's children in a school in this state;

Evidence that the adult applicant is receiving public assistance in this state;

Evidence of registration to vote in this state; or

Other evidence deemed sufficient to the bureau or the department of human services, or both, as proof of residency in this state; and

The adult applicant declares, under penalty of perjury, that all of the following apply:

The adult applicant does not own or lease a principal residence outside of this state; and

The adult applicant is not receiving public assistance outside of this state. As used in this subdivision (b)(2)(B), “public assistance” does not include unemployment insurance benefits.

Residency for minors shall be determined as otherwise permitted under state and federal law. A minor for the purposes of this subsection (c) is a person younger than nineteen (19) years of age.

A denial of determination of residency may be appealed in the same manner as any other denial of eligibility. A determination of residency shall not be granted unless a preponderance of the credible evidence supports the adult applicant's intent to remain indefinitely in this state. In making determinations or verifications of residency, subject to the requirements of subsection (b), the department of human services shall apply the same policies and procedures as are applied in the determination of residency for other programs administered by the department to the extent permitted under or by federal law.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-120 (Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(52); T.C.A., §§ 14-1921,14-23-120), concerning the medical care advisory committee, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 15, § 3. Acts 1997, ch. 15, § 2 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of §4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the medical care advisory committee, terminated and ceased all activities on July 1, 1997.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

71-5-121. Transfer of income or resources.

In all actions for the transfer of income or resources from an institutionalized spouse for the support of the community spouse, the court shall apply the standards utilized to determine medicaid eligibility in this state, regardless of any state laws relating to community property or the division of marital property.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. This section, formerly §14-23-121 (Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 22; T.C.A., § 14-1922), concerning approval of the department of health, education and welfare, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 476, § 4. For new law, see §§71-5-106,71-5-107,71-5-132.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare, shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

71-5-122. Statement of interest of vendors or suppliers holding equity interest in hospitals, apothecaries or nursing homes.

Any individual or corporate vendor or provider participating under this part who holds an equity interest in any hospital, apothecary, nursing home, or other vendor or provider participating under this part shall submit annually to the department of finance and administration information disclosing their interest in these vendors or providers.

Any such party who fails to file the information required by this section shall not be entitled to participate in the program.

Acts 1969, ch. 326, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 14-1923, 14-23-122.

71-5-123. Statement of public officials as to interest in vendors or providers.

Any department head, deputy, assistant, or director of any state department, including, but not limited to, any person who certificates eligibles or who makes payments to vendors or providers participating under this part, and who holds any equity interest in any hospital, apothecary, nursing home, or other vendors or providers participating under this part, shall submit annually to the department of finance and administration information disclosing their interest in these vendors or providers.

Acts 1969, ch. 326, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-1924, 14-23-123.

71-5-124. Duties of department of finance and administration.

The department of finance and administration shall supervise and assist the department of health, which shall be the single state agency as defined in the federal Medicaid Law, Title XIX with respect to all financial matters in the planning and establishment of the medical assistance program as set forth in §§ 71-5-101 — 71-5-120, and after the program is established on July 1, 1969, the department of finance and administration shall perform those functions with respect to such medical assistance programs as are set forth in title 9, chapter 4, part 51.

In addition, the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury have the duty and authority to review and audit such expenditure of funds as may be made under this part either directly or indirectly by any fiscal intermediary, and nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the commissioner of finance and administration to ensure that program expenditures are maintained within legislative appropriations.

Acts 1969, ch. 326, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 14-1925, 14-23-124.

71-5-125. Duties of fiscal review committee.

The fiscal review committee is directed to obtain the following information from the single state agency in charge of medicaid and the department of human services and report quarterly to the membership of the general assembly, except that if an item on the report has not changed from one (1) quarter to the next, there shall be no necessity to repeat this information in the subsequent report:

All expenditures under the medicaid program in the preceding quarter;

The quarterly allotment for the next quarter;

Any requests for additional funds;

The classifications set up for the staffing of the medicaid personnel;

The names, salary, position and previous work experience of staff hired;

Caseloads, increases and decreases;

Dollar expenditures and utilization of the separate programs under medicaid; and

Copies of all regulations issued to implement the medicaid program.

Acts 1969, ch. 326, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-1926, 14-23-125; Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 19; 2012, ch. 673, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

71-5-126. Medicaid expansion under federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act prohibited without joint resolution of General Assembly.

The governor shall not make any decision or obligate the state of Tennessee in any way with regard to the expansion of optional enrollment in the medical assistance program, also known as the medicaid program, pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148, as interpreted by the United States Supreme Court in National Federation of Independent Business v. Sebelius to be unconstitutional when applied to states as a mandatory expansion, unless authorized by joint resolution of the general assembly.

Acts 2014, ch. 662, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148, referred to in this section is compiled primarily throughout U.S.C. Title 42. The case cited above may be found at the following citation: National Federation of Independent Business v. Sebelius , 132 S. Ct. 2566, 183 L. Ed. 2d 450, 2012 U.S. LEXIS 4876 (2012).

Law Reviews.

Eat Your Broccoli: The Affordable Care Act Is a Valid Exercise of Congress's War Power, 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 639 (2013).

Obamacare as a Window on Judicial Strategy, 80 Tenn. L. Rev. 763 (2013).

Thou Shalt Opt Out: Reforming the Religious Conscience Exemption from Social Security and the Affordable Care Act Based on State Experience, 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 659 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed Insure Tennessee pilot program; use of annual coverage assessment of hospitals to fund program when federal match rate declines. OAG 15-06, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (1/26/15).

The process established by T.C.A. §71-5-126 does not contravene the separation of powers provision of the Tennessee Constitution. The absence of a joint resolution passed pursuant to T.C.A. §71-5-126 would not prohibit the governor from negotiating an agreement with the federal government to expand Medicaid; it would, however, prohibit the governor from making a final decision to bind the State of Tennessee to that agreement or to implement that agreement. OAG 15-66, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (9/14/15).

71-5-127. Conflict with federal law — Single state agency.

If it is found that any of the provisions of this part are in conflict with the single state agency requirements of the federal Medicaid Law, Title XIX, then, and in that event, the department of finance and administration shall become the single state agency.

Acts 1969, ch. 326, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 14-1928, 14-23-127.

71-5-128. Contracts with health maintenance organizations — Requirements.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department of health shall follow, as nearly as is practicable, the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 1395mm, as amended, together with any federal rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such law, with respect to a health maintenance organization with which the state has entered into a contract for the provision of services under this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 286, § 2; T.C.A., §14-23-128.

71-5-129. Charges for services of physician assistants.

Charges to be reimbursed for physician assistants from medicaid funds shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the charges provided for licensed physicians under the medicaid program or fees charged by licensed physicians that are reasonable in the locality where the services are provided.

Acts 1983, ch. 168, § 12; T.C.A., §14-23-129.

Cross-References. Physician Assistant Act, title 63, ch. 19.

71-5-130. Determination of payments to vendors — Audits.

With regard to the payments to vendors pursuant to this part:

The payment for all vendors providing health care that receive payment pursuant to this part shall be determined by the comptroller of the treasury, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the department, pursuant to § 71-5-105, and shall be paid by the department;

In order that payment can be determined for all vendors providing health care that receive payment pursuant to this part, the department shall require such vendors to submit to the comptroller of the treasury, cost data, statistical data, and other information, as may be necessary, on such forms as are approved or formulated by the department, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the Tennessee Hospital Association. The comptroller of the treasury, in consultation with the department, may require that such cost data and other information, in order to be acceptable, be certified by the administrator of the vendor and by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant; and all such data shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury, or agency or organization designated by the comptroller of the treasury;

To be eligible to receive payment, contracting hospitals shall use uniform hospital statistics and classification of accounts as published by the American Hospital Association for all accounting records, or any other acceptable accounting methods approved by the department in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the Tennessee Hospital Association;

In consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, the department may also require other vendors to use uniform statistics and classification of accounts;

Any contracting hospital that does not adopt the uniform classification of accounts, as it shall be established by the department, or that does not submit certified statements when required by the department, shall be assessed a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day the hospital is not in compliance with this subsection (a);

Any nursing home that does not adopt a uniform classification of accounts, or does not submit certified statements, or does not submit cost data and other information, as required by the department, shall be assessed the penalty provided by subdivision (a)(4)(A);

Any other vendor providing health care pursuant to this part that does not adopt a uniform classification of accounts, or does not submit certified statements, or does not submit cost data and other information, as required by the department, shall be assessed the penalty provided by subdivision (a)(4)(A);

The comptroller of the treasury in carrying out responsibilities under this part, with regard to the determination of payments for particular vendors, and the auditing of data submitted, is hereby authorized to enter into contracts and agreements, and to make such arrangements as are necessary with other state departments and agencies, and with organizations or firms providing such services. The final authority for the determination and certification of payment to the department shall be the comptroller of the treasury;

The departments of human services and health may enter into agreements with the comptroller of the treasury with regard to services performed in payment determination and auditing, and are hereby authorized to reimburse the comptroller of the treasury for the performance of such services out of funds available to the department; and

All legal aids granted to the comptroller of the treasury by any other law are expressly reserved to the comptroller of the treasury in auditing any contracting vendor for the purpose of verifying the cost data and other information submitted by the vendor.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed as obligating the state during any fiscal year for any payment exceeding the amount appropriated by the general assembly for this purpose, and budgeted by the department or departments administering these programs.

Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 10; T.C.A., §14-23-130; Acts 1988, ch. 779, §§ 3-5.

Cross-References. Reimbursement of health care provider costs, title 12, ch. 4, part 3.

71-5-131. Contributed funds.

For the purposes of this part, political subdivisions may appropriate funds directly to the department, other public agencies and private sources may transfer funds to the department, and the department may accept unconditional and unrestricted donations of such funds.

Contributed funds shall be subject to the department's administrative control and allocated as provided in the general appropriations act, except such contributions shall not reduce state general revenue funding.

At the end of any fiscal year, the unobligated balance of any such funds shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be reappropriated for these purposes in the next fiscal year.

Acts 1987, ch. 71, § 1.

71-5-132. Medicaid providers — Responsibilities — Changes in ownership or controlling interest.

No change of ownership or controlling interest of an existing medicaid provider, including, but not limited to, hospitals, nursing home facilities, home health agencies, and pharmacies, can occur until provision is made for moneys owed to medicaid. The purchaser shall notify medicaid of the purchase at the time of ownership change and is financially liable for the outstanding liabilities to medicaid for one (1) year from the date of purchase or for one (1) year following medicaid's receipt of the provider's medicare final notice of program reimbursement, whichever is later. The purchaser shall be entitled to utilize any means available to it by law to secure and recoup these funds from the selling entity. In addition, purchasers of nursing facilities are responsible for obtaining an accurate accounting and transfer of funds held in trust for medicaid residents at the time of the change of ownership or controlling interest.

If the division of medicaid has not reimbursed a business for medicaid services provided under the medicaid program at the time the business is sold, when such an amount is determined the division of medicaid shall be required to reimburse the person owning the business; provided, that such sale included the sale of such assets.

Acts 1992, ch. 933, §§ 2, 3.

71-5-133. Provision of information concerning Norplant and other contraceptives.

The department of human services shall provide written information concerning the availability through the medicaid program of the Norplant contraceptive implant, and other functionally equivalent contraceptives that provide similar long-lasting pregnancy prevention, to all temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) recipients or to recipients of any successor program when such persons apply for benefits or are recertified. The department shall provide information concerning the availability of birth control and contraceptive implants to all males whose incomes are below the federal poverty level and who are receiving any other state or federal government subsidies, including, but not limited to, food assistance pursuant to part 3 of this chapter, if such males also qualify for medicaid and are able to impregnate females. Such information shall also be supplied to other women of child-bearing age whose income is below the federal poverty level and are receiving any other state or federal government subsidies, including, but not limited to, food assistance pursuant to chapter 5, part 3 of this title, if such persons also qualify for medicaid. The information provided shall clearly state that qualified health care providers are available to discuss the contraceptive in more detail upon request.

Together with the information concerning availability required to be provided pursuant to subsection (a), the department shall also provide to each eligible recipient information regarding any risks involved in having such contraceptive implanted, as well as information on the use of all types of contraceptives, including abstinence, and the moral benefits of abstinence until marriage, and the health and other benefits of abstinence, which shall be disseminated in a manner that is reasonably calculated to make the information easily accessible to all recipients under the TANF program or to recipients of any successor program, as well as to other women of child-bearing age whose incomes are below the federal poverty level and who are receiving any other state or federal government subsidies, including, but not limited to, food assistance pursuant to chapter 5, part 3 of this title, if such persons also qualify for medicaid. The department's case workers will assist in making the appointment with the appropriate county health department.

Acts 1993, ch. 255, § 1; 1996, ch. 950, § 17.

Code Commission Notes.

Former references to “aid to families with dependent children (AFDC)” were deleted as obsolete by the code commission and were changed to “temporary assistance for needy families (TANF)” in 2004.

71-5-134. Rules and regulations — Funding medical assistance.

The commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the amendments to §§71-5-102 —71-5-106 by Acts 1993, ch. 358. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1993, ch. 358, § 7; 2007, ch. 505, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

The provisions of this section may be affected by the agreement between the federal and state governments that created the TennCare program.

Cross-References. TennCare enabling bill (Acts 1993, ch. 358), compiled in §§71-5-102 —71-5-106.

Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, §§71-5-181 —71-5-185.

71-5-135. State unemployment health care benefits — Scope — Conditions.

If a person who previously had health insurance through their employer becomes uninsured due to bona fide closure of the employer's business or plant, such person, and the person's dependents shall automatically be eligible to enroll in the TennCare program at the expiration of the eighteen-month period authorized for continuing insurance coverage under COBRA. The department shall accept the application of such person prior to the expiration of the eighteen-month period so that health insurance through TennCare will begin immediately upon expiration of COBRA coverage and such person and the person's dependents will at no time be without health care coverage. However, nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to provide TennCare coverage in situations where a business or plant declares bankruptcy or otherwise declares it is going out of business when the purpose, primary or otherwise, of such declaration is to establish TennCare coverage for its employees and the business or plant intends to reopen under the same or another identity with essentially the same ownership or management, or both. Reopening of a business with the same or another identity and essentially the same ownership or management, or both, shall be considered refutable evidence that the earlier closure was for the purpose of establishing TennCare eligibility for the business's employees. It is the legislative intent that this section be implemented only to the extent that it is determined to be consistent with the terms, conditions and eligibility criteria of the TennCare waiver as approved by the United States department of health and human services.

Acts 1994, ch. 857, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA), referred to in this section, are codified in 29 U.S.C. § 1166 or 42 U.S.C. § 300bb-6.

Attorney General Opinions. The TennCare waiver that took effect on July 1, 2002, is not inconsistent with the provisions of T.C.A. §71-5-135 concerning the eligibility of dislocated workers for enrollment in the TennCare program, OAG 02-124, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 129 (11/18/02).

71-5-136. Hold harmless requirements prohibited.

No health insurer, prepaid group health plan, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization or similar entity licensed under this part that provides or administers health insurance under the TennCare Program, shall require, by contract or otherwise, any title 63 or 68 licensee to indemnify or hold harmless such TennCare managed care organization or title 56 licensee for tort or patent or copyright infringement liability that such TennCare managed care organization or title 56 licensee incurs, experiences, or causes by act or omission, or by act or omission of the title 63 or 68 provider to the extent the act or omission was pursuant to a directive of the title 56 licensee.

Acts 1997, ch. 376, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. TennCare/House Bill 2002, OAG 00-016, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/2/00).